Wyoming, session 2026, HB0082.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-1-420 is created to read:

HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384
9-1-420. Strategic investments and projects account
highway construction loans; maximum amount; repayment.

(a) With the approval of the state loan and
investment board, the state treasurer shall be authorized
to invest not more than two hundred fifty million dollars
($250,000,000.00) from the permanent Wyoming mineral trust
fund to provide loans to the department of transportation
for purposes of funding the construction of one (1) or more
highways approved by the transportation commission. The
authority to invest funds under this subsection shall
remain in effect until June 30, 2030.

(b) The interest rates on the loans authorized under
subsection (a) of this section shall be at a fixed interest
rate determined by the state treasurer to be reasonably
commensurate with the rates of return of the asset class
for which the monies would be otherwise invested but shall
not exceed two and one-half percent (2.5%). The amounts
invested in loans under subsection (a) of this section
shall be repaid as provided by subsection (e) of this
section.

HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384
(c) Amounts invested in loans under subsection (a) of
this section shall be public purpose investments for
purposes of W.S. 9-4-715(n).

(d) In addition to the amounts invested in loans
specified in subsection (a) of this section, the
transportation commission shall direct any available
federal highway safety funds to the construction of one (1)
or more highways approved by the transportation commission.

(e) Beginning on June 30, 2027 and on each June 30
thereafter until the loans issued under this section are
repaid, the state auditor shall transfer funds in the
amount specified in this subsection from any unexpended,
unobligated funds within the strategic investments and
projects account to the permanent Wyoming mineral trust
fund. The transfer required under this subsection shall be
in accordance with all of the following:

(i) The amount transferred in any one (1) fiscal
year under this subsection shall be the lesser of fifty
million dollars ($50,000,000.00), the amount remaining to
be repaid on all loans issued under this section or the
HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384
unobligated, unencumbered balance of the strategic
investments and projects account;

(ii) In addition to the amount transferred under
paragraph (i) of this subsection, the amount transferred
each fiscal year shall include interest as determined by
the state treasurer under subsection (b) of this section;

(iii) The state auditor shall cease transferring
funds under this subsection when all loan amounts and
interest are repaid.

Section 2. W.S. 9-4-715(n)(intro) and
9-4-719(b)(intro) are amended to read:

9-4-715. Permissible investments.

(n) The state treasurer shall not invest state funds
for a specific public purpose authorized or directed by the
legislature in excess of a total of one billion dollars
($1,000,000,000.00), excluding investments made pursuant to
W.S. 37-5-406 or 37-5-605. By November 1 of each calendar
year, the state treasurer, in consultation with the board,
HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384
the Wyoming water development office, the Wyoming business
council, the department of transportation and the office of
state lands and investments, shall provide a report to the
select committee on capital financing and investments and
the investment funds committee on all state funds invested
for a specific public purpose authorized or directed by the
legislature. The report shall include:

9-4-719. Investment earnings; spending policy;
permanent funds.

(b) There is created the permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund reserve account. All funds within the account
shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized
under W.S. 9-4-715(a), (d), (e) and (r) and all investment
earnings from the account shall be credited to the account.
Except for funds specified by the legislature that
guarantee the obligations of permanent Wyoming mineral
trust fund investment earnings and funds to be transferred
into the permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, funds
deposited into the reserve account created by this
subsection are intended to be inviolate and constitute a
permanent or perpetual trust fund. Beginning July 1, 2021
HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384
for fiscal year 2022 and each fiscal year thereafter, to
the extent funds are available, the state treasurer shall
transfer unobligated funds from this account to the general
fund on a quarterly, pro-rata basis as necessary to ensure
that an amount equal to two and one-half percent (2.5%) of
the previous five (5) year average market value of the
permanent Wyoming mineral trust fund, calculated on the
first day of the fiscal year, is available for expenditure
during each fiscal year. As soon as possible after the end
of each of the fiscal years beginning on and after July 1,
2017, after making any transfer required pursuant to
paragraphs (i) and (ii) of this subsection, revenues in
this account in excess of two hundred forty-five percent
(245%) of the spending policy amount in subsection (d) of
this section shall be credited to the permanent Wyoming
mineral trust fund. For fiscal year 2020 2027 and for each
fiscal year thereafter:

Section 3.

(a) Upon approval by the transportation commission,
the planning, design and construction of the following
HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384
projects shall be authorized and shall be paid from funds
made available under W.S. 9-1-420:

(i) The creation of passing lanes on United
States highway 20 between Casper, Wyoming and Waltman,
Wyoming where the department of transportation determines
appropriate after conducting a traffic study of this
portion of highway;

(ii) The creation of passing lanes on United
States highway 20 between Waltman, Wyoming and Shoshoni,
Wyoming where the department of transportation determines
appropriate after conducting a traffic study of this
portion of highway;

(iii) The creation of passing lanes on United
States highway 20 between Shoshoni, Wyoming and
Thermopolis, Wyoming where the department of transportation
determines appropriate after conducting a traffic study of
this portion of highway;

(iv) The portion of United States highway 287
between Laramie, Wyoming and the Colorado state line that
HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384
consists of only two (2) lanes in order to make that entire
portion of the highway four (4) lanes;

(v) The portion of Wyoming Highway 59 between
Wright, Wyoming and Gillette, Wyoming to make that entire
portion of the highway five (5) lanes;

(vi) An alternative paved highway from Rock
Springs to Green River on the north side of Interstate 80.

Section 4.

(a) There is created the interstate highways traffic
study task force to consist of the following members:

(i) Six (6) members of the legislature as
follows:

(A) Three (3) members of the Wyoming house
of representatives, appointed by the speaker of the house.
The speaker of the house shall designate one (1) of the
members appointed under this subparagraph to be co-chairman
of the task force;
HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384

(B) Three (3) members of the Wyoming
senate, appointed by the president of the senate. The
president of the senate shall designate one (1) of the
members appointed under this subparagraph to be co-chairman
of the task force.

(ii) Three (3) members of the Wyoming state
government, as follows:

(A) The governor or the governor's
designee;

(B) The director of the department of
transportation or the director's designee;

(C) The executive director of the office of
tourism or the director's designee.

(iii) Six (6) members of the public appointed by
the governor. A member representing:

(A) The trucking industry;
HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384

(B) Wyoming local governments;

(C) The mining industry;

(D) The agriculture industry;

(E) The construction industry;

(F) The railroad industry.

(b) The task force shall:

(i) Study traffic and conditions on Wyoming's
interstate highways, focusing specifically on Interstate
80;

(ii) Study and consider methods for reducing
traffic and highway deterioration on Wyoming's interstate
highways, focusing specifically on Interstate 80,
including:

HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384
(A) A method that uses the railroad to
transport commercial motor vehicles across areas served by
interstate highways and requires commercial motor vehicles
to pay a fee for the transportation;

(B) A method that creates additional lanes
on interstate highways.

(iii) Study and explore funding strategies for
the methods considered under paragraph (ii) of this
subsection;

(iv) Not later than July 1, 2027, report to the
governor, management council and the joint transportation,
highways and military affairs interim committee on the work
of the task force, including any recommendations for
legislation for consideration by an appropriate legislative
committee.

(c) The task force shall be staffed by the
legislative service office.

HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384
(d) The legislative members of the task force shall
receive salary, per diem and travel expenses in the manner
and amount prescribed by W.S. 28-5-101. Task force members
who are state employees or government officials shall be
considered to be acting within the scope of regular
employment when conducting the official business of the
task force and shall receive their regular pay without
additional compensation, except that those members shall
receive mileage and per diem as provided for other members
of the task force under this subsection if they are not
reimbursed by their employer. Task force members who are
not state employees shall receive per diem and mileage in
the amount provided for members of the legislature under
W.S. 28-5-101.

(e) The task force shall terminate November 1, 2027.

Section 5.

(a) There is appropriated twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000.00) from the general fund to the
legislative service office for purposes of providing
salary, mileage and per diem to the legislative members of
HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384
the task force appointed under section 4(a)(i) of this act
and for other expenses of the task force. This
appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the
effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2028. This
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028.

(b) There is appropriated twenty-five thousand
dollars ($25,000.00) from the general fund to the office of
the governor for purposes of providing mileage and per diem
to the members of the task force appointed under section
4(a)(iii) of this act and for providing mileage and per
diem for members of the task force appointed under section
4(a)(ii) of this act, subject to section 4(d) of this act.
This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with
the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2028.
This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided
by law on June 30, 2028.

HB0082

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0384
Section 6. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)

HB0082